Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 2. Civil Arrest.

Cross references. —

For related provisions in court rules, see Civ. R. 87.

Collateral references. —

5 Am. Jur. 2d, Arrest, §§ 53-66. 30 Am. Jur. 2d, Executions and Enforcement of Judgments, §§ 537-550.

6A C.J.S., Arrest, §§ 71-98.

Sec. 09.40.120.
Arrest and bail in civil actions.

The plaintiff in a civil action may have the defendant arrested and held to bail in the manner provided in AS

09.40.120

—

09.40.220

. The writ of ne exeat is abolished.

History.

(§ 9.01 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.130.
Grounds for arrest.

The defendant may be arrested in an action for debt when the defendant is about to remove from the state with intent to defraud creditors or is absconding.

History.

(§ 9.02 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.140.
Order for arrest.

An order for the arrest of the defendant may be obtained only from a judge of the court in which the action is brought.
The order shall be made immediately whenever it appears to the judge that a sufficient claim and proper grounds exist.

History.

(§ 9.03 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.150.
Undertaking by plaintiff.

Before making the order, the judge shall require an undertaking on the part of the plaintiff, with one or more sufficient sureties, to the effect that the plaintiff will pay all costs that may be adjudged to the defendant, and all damages that the defendant may sustain by reason of the arrest if the same be wrongful or without sufficient cause, not exceeding the sum specified in the undertaking.
The undertaking shall be in a sum to be fixed by the judge, but not less than $300.

History.

(§ 9.04 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.160.
Time for order for arrest.

The order may be made at the time of the issuing of the summons or afterwards but before the judgment. It shall require a peace officer to immediately arrest the defendant and to hold the defendant to bail in the amount specified.

History.

(§ 9.05 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Cross references. —

For arrest after judgment, see AS

09.35.320

.

Sec. 09.40.170.
Discharge on bail or deposit.

The defendant, at any time before execution, shall be discharged from the arrest either upon giving bail or upon depositing the amount mentioned in the order for arrest.

History.

(§ 9.06 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.180.
Amount of bail.

The defendant may give bail by causing a written undertaking to be executed by one or more sufficient sureties to the effect that they are bound in the amount mentioned in the order for arrest, that the defendant will be amenable to the process of the court during the pendency of the action and to processes that may be issued to enforce the judgment, or that they will pay the plaintiff the amount of the judgment that may be recovered in the action.

History.

(§ 9.07 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.190.
Surrender of defendant by bail or in person.

At any time before failure to comply with the undertaking, the bail may surrender the defendant in their exoneration, or the defendant may surrender to a peace officer of the court where the action is pending.

History.

(§ 9.08 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.200.
Arrest of defendant by or on authority of bail.

For the purpose of surrendering the defendant, the bail, at any time and place before they are finally charged, may personally arrest the defendant, or, by a written authority endorsed on a certified copy of the undertaking, may empower a peace officer to do so. Upon the arrest of the defendant by a peace officer, or upon delivery of the defendant to the peace officer by the bail, or upon the defendant’s own surrender, the bail are exonerated if the arrest, delivery, or surrender takes place at a time before judgment. But if the arrest, delivery, or surrender does not take place before judgment, the bail are finally charged on their undertaking, and bound to pay the amount of the judgment.

History.

(§ 9.09 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.210.
Exoneration of bail.

The bail are exonerated by the defendant’s death, imprisonment in a penitentiary, or legal discharge from the obligation to be amenable to the process.

History.

(§ 9.10 ch 101 SLA 1962)

Sec. 09.40.220.
Motion to vacate order for arrest or to reduce bail.

A defendant arrested may, at any time before judgment, apply on a motion to the court or a judge of the court in which the action is pending to vacate the order for arrest or to reduce the amount of bail.
If upon the hearing of the motion it appears that there was not sufficient cause for the arrest, the order shall be vacated; or if it appears that the bail was fixed too high, the amount shall be reduced.

History.

(§ 9.11 ch 101 SLA 1962)